Hawaii statutes.
[§206E-186] Special facility revenue bonds;
special funds. (a) A separate special fund shall be established for each
special facility financed from the proceeds of the revenue bonds secured under
the same trust indenture. Each fund shall be designated "special facility
revenue bond special fund" and shall bear additional designation as the
authority deems appropriate to properly identify the fund.

(b) Notwithstanding any other law to the
contrary, including particularly section 206E-16, all revenues, income, and
receipts derived from the special facility for which the revenue bonds are
issued shall be paid into the special facility revenue bond fund established
for that special facility and applied as provided in the proceedings
authorizing the issuance of the revenue bonds. [L 2001, c 180, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next